Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3926
Commission; quorum.

Five members of the commission constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The commission may act by a majority of the members present at any meeting at which a quorum is in attendance.

Laws 1995, LB 646, § 8.